Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1004
Nebraska Safety Center; director; other personnel.

The Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska (1) may employ a director of the center who shall be responsible to the chief administrative officer at the University of Nebraska at Kearney and whose qualifications and salary shall be established by the board and (2) may employ or assign to the center such other professors, instructors, tutors, demonstrators, and other personnel as from time to time may be considered necessary for the administration of the center.

Laws 1978, LB 693, § 4;

Laws 1989, LB 247, § 30.